District of Columbia statutes.
46-306.15

Repealed

Jurisdiction to modify child-support order of foreign country or political subdivision.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 615
as added June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(f)(11), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 615 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
This section is referenced in § 46-302.01, § 46-306.10, and § 46-306.11.